Hawaii, session 2025, SB784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 803, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "CHAPTER 803 ARRESTS, SEARCH WARRANTS, REMOVALS" SECTION 2.  Chapter 803, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part .  rEMOVALS §803-A  Removal by law enforcement; trespass.  Pursuant to section 708-813, an owner of a dwelling or premises being trespassed upon, or the owner's agent, may request from state or county law enforcement the immediate removal of a person or persons unlawfully occupying or remaining in or upon the dwelling or premises; provided that the following conditions are met: (1)  The requesting person is the owner of the dwelling or premises, or the authorized agent of the owner; (2)  The real property being trespassed upon includes a residential dwelling; (3)  An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully entered and remain in or upon the dwelling or premises; (4)  The dwelling or premises was not open to members of the public at the time the unauthorized person or persons entered; (5)  The owner or authorized agent of the owner has directed the unauthorized person or persons to leave the property; (6)  The unauthorized person or persons are not current or former tenants pursuant to chapter 521; (7)  The unauthorized person or persons are not immediate family members of the owner; and (8)  There is no pending or ongoing litigation related to the dwelling or premises between the owner and any known unauthorized person. §803-B  Process for removal.  (a)  To request the immediate removal of an unlawful occupant of a dwelling or premises, pursuant to section 803-A, the owner or owner's authorized agent shall submit a complaint by presenting a completed and verified complaint form to a law enforcement officer. (b)  The complaint form shall be developed and published by the department of the attorney general, pursuant to chapter 91, and made available online by the department of law enforcement.  The police department in each county shall make physical copies of the complaint form, as published and approved by the attorney general, available at each police station within the county. (c)  Upon receipt of a valid complaint form, the law enforcement officer shall verify that the person submitting the complaint is the owner of record of the dwelling or premises and appears otherwise entitled to relief under this section. If verified, the law enforcement officer, without delay, shall serve a notice to immediately vacate on all the unlawful occupants and shall put the owner, or authorized agent of the owner, in possession of the dwelling or premises.  Service may be accomplished by hand delivery of the notice to an occupant or by posting the notice on the front door or entrance of the dwelling or premises.  The law enforcement officer shall also attempt to verify the identities of all persons occupying the dwelling and note the identities on the return of service. (d)  If appropriate, the law enforcement officer may arrest any person found in or upon the dwelling or premises for trespass, outstanding warrants, or any other legal cause, pursuant to part I of this chapter. §803-C  Fees; request to keep the peace; liability.  (a)  The law enforcement officer in receipt of a valid complaint, pursuant to section 803-B, shall be entitled to the same fee for service of the notice to immediately vacate as if the law enforcement officer were serving a writ of possession, pursuant to section 607-8. (b)  After the law enforcement officer serves the notice to immediately vacate, the owner or authorized agent may request that the law enforcement officer stand by to keep the peace while the owner or authorized agent of the owner changes the locks and removes the personal property of the unlawful occupants from the premises to or near the property line.  When a request to stand by is made, the law enforcement officer may charge a reasonable hourly rate, and the person requesting the law enforcement officer to stand by and keep the peace shall be responsible for paying the reasonable hourly rate, as set by the department of law enforcement or county police department. (c)  The law enforcement officer shall not be liable to the unlawful occupant or any other party for property loss, destruction, or damage.  The owner or authorized agent of the owner shall not be liable to an unlawful occupant or any other party for the loss, destruction, or damage to the personal property unless the removal was wrongful. §803-D  Wrongful removal; civil cause of action.  (a)  An owner or authorized agent of an owner commits the offense of perjury pursuant to section 710-1060 if the owner or authorized agent of the owner: (1)  Submits a fraudulent complaint; or (2)  Knowingly includes false information in the complaint; resulting in the wrongful removal of a rightful occupant, pursuant to this part. (b)  A person may bring a civil cause of action for wrongful removal pursuant to this part.  A person harmed by a wrongful removal may be restored to possession of the dwelling or premises and may recover actual costs and damages incurred, statutory damages equal to triple the fair market rent of the dwelling, court costs, and reasonable attorney fees.  The court shall advance the cause on the calendar. §803-E  Rights of owner; law enforcement authority.  Nothing in this part shall limit the property rights of an owner or the authority of a law enforcement officer to arrest an unlawful occupant for trespassing, vandalism, theft, or other crimes." SECTION 3.  Chapter 663, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§663- Liability of unlawful occupants of a dwelling or premises; public utilities.  (a)  An unlawful occupant of a dwelling or premises, pursuant to section 708-813, shall be liable in damages to the owner of the dwelling or premises for outstanding or unpaid utility bills, fees, or other charges incurred while the unlawful occupant was in possession or control of the dwelling or premises. (b) Nothing in this section shall apply to tenants, pursuant to chapter 521, or otherwise rightful occupants of a dwelling or premises according to law." SECTION 4.  Section 708-821, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows: "(1)  A person commits the offense of criminal property damage in the second degree if by means other than fire: (a)  The person intentionally or knowingly damages the property of another, without the other's consent, by the use of widely dangerous means; (b)  The person intentionally or knowingly damages the property of another, without the other's consent, in an amount exceeding $1,500; [or] (c)  The person, while unlawfully trespassing in or upon a dwelling or premises pursuant to section 708-813, intentionally or knowingly damages the dwelling or property therein in an amount exceeding $999; or [(c)] (d)  The person intentionally or knowingly damages the agricultural equipment, supplies, or products or aquacultural equipment, supplies, or products of another, including trees, bushes, or any other plant and livestock of another, without the other's consent, in an amount exceeding $500.  In calculating the amount of damages to agricultural products, the amount of damages includes future losses and the loss of future production." SECTION 5.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 6.  In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________